Nevada, session 83, AB47.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 387.1213 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
387.1213 1. The Education Stabilization Account is hereby
created in the State Education Fund. Except as otherwise provided
in this section, each year after the close of the previous fiscal year
and before the issuance of the State Controller’s annual report, each
county school district shall transfer from the county school district
fund to the Education Stabilization Account any amount by which
the actual ending fund balance of the county school district fund
exceeds 16.6 percent of the total actual expenditures for the fund.
The interest and income earned on the money in the Account, after
deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to the Account.
2. Money transferred pursuant to subsection 1 to the Education
Stabilization Account is a continuing appropriation solely for the
purpose of authorizing the expenditure of the transferred money for
the purposes set forth in this section.
3. The balance in the Education Stabilization Account must not
exceed 20 percent of the total of all appropriations and
authorizations from the State Education Fund, excluding the
Education Stabilization Account, for the immediately preceding
fiscal year. Any money transferred to the Education Stabilization
Account which exceeds this amount must instead be transferred to
the [State Education Fund.] Department for allocation to each
county school district in this State in an amount that is
proportional to the number of pupils enrolled in the county school
district, as compared to the total number of pupils enrolled in a
county school district in this State. If money is allocated to
a county school district in a fiscal year, the board of trustees of the
county school district shall submit to the Department a plan for
the expenditure of money allocated to the county school district
pursuant to this subsection. If the Superintendent of Public
Instruction determines that the county school district will use the
money allocated to it pursuant to this subsection for the purposes
set forth in this subsection and will comply with the requirements
of subsection 8, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
direct the State Controller to transfer to each county school district
the amount of money allocated to it pursuant to this subsection.
-
*AB47*

– 3 –
The State Controller shall thereupon make the transfer. Any
money transferred to a county school district pursuant to this
subsection must be used for:
(a) The retention and recruitment of teachers and other
educational personnel; and
(b) The training and professional development of teachers and
other educational personnel.
4. If the Interim Finance Committee finds that:
(a) Upon submission of a request from the Department, the
actual enrollment growth for a fiscal year exceeds the projected
enrollment growth by an amount that the Interim Finance
Committee determines would make a transfer of money to the State
Education Fund necessary to fund the excess enrollment;
(b) The collection of revenue in any fiscal year will result in the
State Education Fund receiving less money than authorized for
expenditure from the State Education Fund;
(c) Upon submission of a request from the Department, any
amount of money which was deposited in the State Education Fund
is found by an audit to have been deposited in error; or
(d) Upon submission of a request from the Department, any
error in the application of the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan by the
Department has created a shortfall in the State Education Fund,
 the Committee shall by resolution establish an amount of money
to transfer from the Education Stabilization Account to the State
Education Fund and direct the State Controller to transfer that
amount to the State Education Fund. The State Controller shall
thereupon make the transfer.
5. When determining the actual ending fund balance for the
purposes of subsection 1, each county school district shall exclude:
(a) Any money deposited in the county school district fund on or
before June 30, 2020;
(b) Any money apportioned to the county school district for
capital projects or debt service pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS
362.170 and deposited in the county school district fund when
authorized by law; and
(c) Any money transferred to the county school district and
authorized for expenditure as a continuing appropriation pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 6 of NRS 387.1214.
6. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction determines that
the money due from the State Education Fund to a county school
district, charter school or university school for profoundly gifted
pupils pursuant to NRS 387.185 exceeds the amount of money
available in the State Education Fund because of a delay in expected
receipts, he or she may request from the Director of the Office of
Finance a temporary advance from the Education Stabilization
-
*AB47*

– 4 –
Account for the payment of such money due. Upon receipt of such a
request, the Director of the Office of Finance shall make a
recommendation to the Interim Finance Committee to approve the
temporary advance in whole or in part or to deny the request. If the
Interim Finance Committee approves the request in whole or in part,
the Director of the Office of Finance shall notify the State Controller
and the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel Bureau
of the amount approved by the Interim Finance Committee, and the
State Controller shall draw his or her warrant upon receipt of such a
notice of approval. Any money which is temporarily advanced from
the Education Stabilization Account pursuant to this subsection
must be repaid by August 31 following the end of the fiscal year in
which the temporary advance is made.
7. The balance remaining in the State Education Fund,
excluding the balance remaining in the Education Stabilization
Account, that has not been committed for expenditure on or before
June 30 of an odd-numbered fiscal year must be transferred to the
Education Stabilization Account . [to the extent that such a transfer
would not cause the balance in the Education Stabilization Account
to exceed the limit established in subsection 3.]
8. On or before November 1 of the fiscal year immediately
following a fiscal year in which money was transferred to a county
school district pursuant to subsection 3, the superintendent of
each county school district receiving such a transfer shall submit a
report to the Department that:
(a) Identifies the manner in which the county school district
spent the money transferred to the county school district pursuant
to subsection 3 in the immediately preceding fiscal year;
(b) Compares the actual expenditure of such money to the plan
developed by the board of trustees of the school district pursuant
to subsection 3; and
(c) Contains information detailing the success of efforts to:
(1) Retain and recruit teachers and other educational
personnel; and
(2) Train and provide professional development to teachers
and other educational personnel.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB47*